Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§351-61 Terms of order. Except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, any order for the payment of compensation
under this chapter may be made on such terms as the commission deems
appropriate. Without limiting the generality of the preceding sentence, the
order may provide for apportionment of the compensation, for the holding of the
compensation or any part thereof in trust, for the payment of the compensation
in a lump sum or periodic installments, and for the payment of compensation for
hospital, medical, funeral, or burial expenses directly to the person who has
provided such services. All such orders shall contain words clearly informing
the claimant that all awards and orders for payments under this chapter are
subject to the making of an appropriation by the legislature to pay the claim,
except as otherwise provided in section 351-62.5. [L 1967, c 226, pt of §1; HRS
§351-61; am L 1972, c 61, §1d; am L 1998, c 240, §5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next